tests/cases.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../crh.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../crh.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "Cases (singular)":
    bala<n><nom> : bala
    bala<n><acc> : balanı
    bala<n><gen> : balanıñ
    bala<n><dat> : balağa
    bala<n><loc> : balada
    bala<n><abl> : baladan
    ev<n><nom> : ev
    ev<n><acc> : evni
    ev<n><gen> : evniñ
    ev<n><dat> : evge
    ev<n><loc> : evde
    ev<n><abl> : evden
    dost<n><nom> : dost
    dost<n><acc> : dostnı
    dost<n><gen> : dostnıñ
    dost<n><dat> : dostqa
    dost<n><loc> : dostta
    dost<n><abl> : dosttan
    yol<n><acc> : yolnı
    yol<n><gen> : yolnıñ

  "Cases (plural)":
    bala<n><pl><nom> : balalar
    bala<n><pl><acc> : balalarnı
    bala<n><pl><gen> : balalarnıñ
    bala<n><pl><dat> : balalarğa
    bala<n><pl><loc> : balalarda
    bala<n><pl><abl> : balalardan
    ev<n><pl><nom> : evler
    ev<n><pl><acc> : evlerni
    ev<n><pl><gen> : evlerniñ
    ev<n><pl><dat> : evlerge
    ev<n><pl><loc> : evlerde
    ev<n><pl><abl> : evlerden
    dost<n><pl><nom> : dostlar
    dost<n><pl><acc> : dostlarnı
    dost<n><pl><gen> : dostlarnıñ
    dost<n><pl><dat> : dostlarğa
    dost<n><pl><loc> : dostlarda
    dost<n><pl><abl> : dostlardan
